Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-224
Fish, when used as a verb, defined.

Fish, when used as a verb, means to pursue, shoot, catch, capture, collect, harvest, kill, destroy, or attempt to pursue, shoot, catch, capture, collect, harvest, kill, or destroy.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 34.